Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 39
IDAHO ARCHAEOLOGICAL SURVEY

Section.

33-3901. Idaho archaeological survey created — Purpose — Definition — Advisory board.

There is hereby created the Idaho archaeological survey, to be administered as a special cooperative program under the authority of the board of trustees of the Idaho state historical society and the board of regents of the university of Idaho. It is the policy of the state of Idaho that the archaeological resources recovered from within the state, and their associated documentation, be accorded long-term curation within the state to ensure their continued accessibility by the educational programs of the state universities and for the public benefit of the citizens of the state of Idaho. It is a policy of the state of Idaho that archaeological inventories conducted within the state be documented in a comprehensive database accessible by educational programs and for other public purposes consistent with the protection of these resources. The survey shall be the lead state entity for the compilation, coordination, preservation and dissemination of archaeological survey data and long-term curation of collections for Idaho. This information is to be acquired through field and laboratory investigations by the staff of the survey and through cooperative programs with other governmental and private agencies, including the educational programs at the state universities which recover, use and care for archaeological materials. Nothing in this chapter shall limit the established role of the state universities in archaeological research and educational programs using archaeological materials.

For the purposes of this chapter “archaeological resources” refer to both cultural remains and associated environmental materials recovered by archaeological studies and to sites on the landscape containing materials potentially supportive of anthropological or historical archaeological studies.

There is hereby established an advisory board for the survey which shall consist of the following members: the Idaho state archaeologist, who shall be director of the survey and nonvoting chairman of the advisory board, the academic vice presidents of the university of Idaho, Idaho state university and Boise state university or their designated representatives; the governor of the state of Idaho or his designated representative; and a member of the public who shall be elected by a majority vote of the advisory board and who shall serve for a term of two (2) years. Should a vacancy occur in the public member position, the advisory board shall appoint a replacement to serve the remainder of the term. Members of the advisory board shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(b), Idaho Code, which compensation shall be paid from the archaeological survey account created in section 33-3905, Idaho Code. A quorum of the advisory board shall be required to be present to conduct business.

33-3902. Meetings — Office — State archaeologist.

The advisory board shall hold annual meetings at the Idaho state historical society, the university of Idaho, Idaho state university or Boise state university on the first Monday of June of each year and shall hold such other meetings as it may deem necessary. The chief office of the survey and the office of its secretary shall be maintained at the Idaho state historical society. The professional archaeologist holding the position of state archaeologist in the Idaho state historical society is designated director of the survey.

33-3903. Duties — Publications — Cooperation with other agencies — Satellite offices.

It shall be the duty of the Idaho archaeological survey to establish standards for documenting archaeological inventories; to establish standards for curation of archaeological collections; to conduct statewide studies in the field; to perform laboratory studies; to prepare and publish reports on the archaeological resources of the state; to perform analyses and long-term curation of archaeological collections and site inventory information; to determine and distribute to participating institutions an equitable portion of survey and inventory funds from the federal historic preservation funds received by the state of Idaho; and to fix a price upon printed reports and deposit receipts from sales in the archaeological survey account to be used for the preparation and publication of reports of the survey and for no other purpose. The survey shall be allowed to seek and accept funded projects from and form cooperative programs with state and federal agencies and private funding sources for support of the survey’s inventory and curation activities. All moneys received from these projects shall be deposited in the archaeological survey account and shall be used for the aforementioned projects and services. The survey shall be allowed to have satellite offices at the university of Idaho, Idaho state university and Boise state university for the purpose of caring for archaeological collections or survey information or both.

33-3904. Reports.

The Idaho archaeological survey shall annually, on or before the first day of January, make to the governor of the state and to the board of trustees of the Idaho state historical society and the board of regents of the university of Idaho a report detailing major events during the preceding year concerning the archaeological resources of the state, a report of its expenditures and of the work of the survey during the preceding year, and budget requests for the following year; and it shall make a similar report of its doings and its expenditures to the state legislature through the legislative council.

33-3905. Archaeological survey account.

There is hereby created in the dedicated fund of the state treasury, the archaeological survey account. Moneys in the account shall consist of appropriations, gifts, grants, bequests or moneys from any other source and shall be utilized by the state archaeological survey to implement and carry out the provisions of this chapter. Moneys in the account may be expended only pursuant to appropriation by the legislature except for funds received under contracts and grants which may be expended for those purposes without action by the legislature.

33-3906 — 33-3910. Powers of corporations — Election and qualifications of directors and trustees — Powers of directors — Religious tests prohibited — Corporations for private gain prohibited. [Repealed.]